Mississippi statutes. Title 59. Ports, Harbors, Landings and Watercraft
In General

§ 59-21-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Mississippi Boating Law of 1960.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-01; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1960).

§ 59-21-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires a different meaning:

“Commission” means the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

“Length” means the length of the vessel measured from end to end over the deck excluding sheer.

“Livery boat” means any boat for rent or hire.

“Machinery” means inboard and outboard engines and all other types of motors or mechanical devices.

“Motorboat” means any undocumented vessel propelled by machinery, whether or not such machinery is the principal source of propulsion. The term motorboat includes personal watercraft.

“Operate” means to navigate or otherwise use a motorboat or vessel.

“Operator” means the person who operates or who has charge of the navigation or use of a motorboat or a vessel.

“Owner” means the person who claims lawful possession of a vessel by virtue of legal title or equitable interest therein which entitles him to such possession.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, firm, corporation, association, or other entity.

“Ships’ lifeboats” means lifeboats used solely for lifesaving purposes and does not include dinghies, tenders, speedboats, or other type of craft carried aboard a vessel and used for other than lifesaving purposes.

“Undocumented vessel” means any vessel which is not required to have, and does not have, a valid marine document issued by the Bureau of Customs.

“Vessel” means every description of watercraft, other than seaplane on the water, used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on water.

“Waters of this state” means any waters within the territorial limits of this state, and the marginal sea adjacent to this state and the high seas when navigated as a part of a journey or ride to or from the shore of the state; however, “waters of this state” does not mean any private pond or lake which is not used for boat rentals or the charging of fees for fishing therein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-02; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 2; Laws, 1962, ch. 220, § 1; Laws, 1964, ch. 468, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 265, § 2; Laws, 1973, ch. 409, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 353, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 640, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 545, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1997.